Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 3
FIRE AND POLICE MEMBERS' BENEFIT FUND

31-31-301. Investment funds - creation.

There is hereby created the fire and police members' benefit investment fund, which shall consist of the portion of the assets that are designated for investment by the board of the following plans:

The defined benefit system established in part 2 of this article;

Old hire police and fire pension plans established in article 30.5 of this title, which are affiliated with the association pursuant to part 7 of this article;

Exempt plans established pursuant to part 8 of article 30.5 of this title, which are affiliated with the association pursuant to part 7 of this article;

Volunteer firefighter pension plans, which are affiliated with the association pursuant to part 7 of this article; and

The statewide death and disability plan established in part 8 of this article.

The board shall keep an accurate account of the assets of each plan deposited in the investment fund and shall disburse moneys in accordance with the provisions of this article and the applicable plan document.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2006, p. 186, § 11, effective March 31, 2006.)

There is hereby created the fire and police members' self-directed investment fund, which shall consist of the portion of the assets that are designated for self-direction by the member of the following plans:

The defined benefit system established in part 2 of this article;

Old hire police and fire pension plans established in article 30.5 of this title, which are affiliated with the association pursuant to part 7 of this article;

The fire and police members' statewide money purchase plan established in part 5 of this article;

Repealed.

The fire and police members' deferred compensation plans established in part 9 of this article; and

The affiliated exempt plans which are affiliated with the association pursuant to part 7 of this article.

The board shall keep an accurate account of the assets of each plan deposited in the investment fund and shall disburse moneys in accordance with the provisions of this article and the applicable plan document.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 899, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2000:

(3)(d) repealed, p. 76, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2003:

(1)(a)(V) added, p. 744, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 186, § 11, effective March 31.

L. 2010:

(4)(a)(IV) repealed, (SB 10-024), ch. 20, p. 90, § 5, effective August 11.

Editor's note:

Provisions of this section were formerly numbered as §§ 31-30-1012 (1)(a) and 31-30-1012.5.

31-31-302. Fund - management - investment - definitions.

The board shall be the trustee of the fire and police members' benefit investment fund and shall have full and unrestricted discretionary power and authority to invest and reinvest such portions of the fund as in its judgment may not be immediately required for the payment of refunds or benefits. In exercising its discretionary authority with respect to the management and investment of fund assets, the board shall be governed by the standard and other provisions for trustees set forth in the "Colorado Uniform Prudent Investor Act", article 1.1 of title 15, C.R.S.

If the board invests fund moneys through an investment firm offering for sale corporate stocks, bonds, notes, debentures, or a mutual fund that contains corporate securities, the investment firm shall disclose, in any research or other disclosure documents provided in support of the securities being offered, to the board whether the investment firm has an agreement with a for-profit corporation that is not a government-sponsored enterprise, whose securities are being offered for sale to the board and because of such agreement the investment firm:

Had received compensation for investment services banking within the most recent twelve months; or

May receive compensation for investment banking services within the next three consecutive months.

For the purposes of this paragraph (b), "investment firm" means a bank, brokerage firm, or other financial services firm conducting business within this state, or any agent thereof.

"Investment fiduciary" means a person who or entity that exercises any discretionary authority or control over an investment of the association or renders investment advice for the association for a fee or other direct or indirect compensation.

"Investment information" means information that has not been publicly disseminated or that is unavailable from other sources and includes information the release of which might cause an investment vehicle, an investment manager, a general partner, a fund sponsor, or an investment fiduciary significant competitive harm. Investment information includes, but is not limited to, financial performance data and projections, financial statements, lists of co-investors and their level of investment, portions of lists of current or projected investment opportunities that would cause competitive harm, product and market data, rent rolls, leases, other types of proprietary information, or documents and information that investors are legally required to maintain as confidential as a condition of performing due diligence or participating in an investment.

"Investment vehicle" means an entity in which an investment fiduciary has made or considered an investment on behalf of the association. Investment vehicles include but are not limited to sponsored funds, limited partnerships, and limited liability companies.

"Public record" means all or part of a writing, as defined in section 24-72-202 (6), C.R.S.

The board shall designate one or more financial institutions as custodians of the fund. All moneys paid or transmitted to the custodian shall be credited to appropriate accounts in the fund and the custodian shall maintain a current inventory of all investments of the fund.

Disbursements from the fund shall be made, subject to the approval of the board, only for payment of the expenses of the association, refunds to the members, benefits, and investment purposes.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 97, p. 11, § 3, effective March 13, 1997.)

All transactions involving the purchase and sale of investments authorized in this section shall be effected on behalf of the association. To facilitate sale and exchange transactions, securities belonging to the association may be registered in the name of nominees in the discretion of the board and in accordance with standard business practices. All such nominees shall be bonded in such amounts as may be determined to be advisable by the board. Nothing in this subsection (6) shall preclude the board or its authorized agents from forming a corporation described in section 501 (c)(2) and (c)(25) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", 26 U.S.C. sec. 501 (c)(2) and (c)(25), as amended, with respect to the ownership of investments in real property.

The board shall submit an annual audit of the fund to the general assembly and the annual audit of the fund and annual actuarial study, with assumptions, to each employer. Each employer shall make the audit and study available for review by its members. Nothing in this subsection (7) shall be construed as diminishing the obligation of the board to provide any documentation required by the state auditor to carry out his or her responsibilities pursuant to section 2-3-103 (1), C.R.S., regarding state moneys held by the fire and police pension association.

As used in this subsection (8):

(I) "Association" means the fire and police pension association.

(II) "Investment" means the utilization of money or other assets in the expectation of future returns in the form of income or capital gain.

Subject to paragraph (c) of this subsection (8), a public record received, prepared, used, or retained by an investment fiduciary in connection with an investment or potential investment of the association that relates to investment information pertaining to an investment vehicle in which the investment fiduciary has invested or has considered an investment or that relates to investment information whether prepared by or for the investment fiduciary is exempt from the disclosure requirements of part 2 of article 72 of title 24, C.R.S.

If a public record described in paragraph (b) of this subsection (8) is an agreement or instrument to which the association is a party, only those parts of the public record that contain investment information, as defined in subparagraph (IV) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (8), are exempt from the disclosure requirements of part 2 of article 72 of title 24, C.R.S.

At least annually the board shall publish and make available to the public a report of its investments that includes the following:

The name of each investment vehicle in which the association invested during the reporting period;

The aggregate amount of money invested by the association in investment vehicles during the reporting period; and

The rate of return realized during the reporting period on the investments of the association in investment vehicles.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 900, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 97:

(1) and (4) to (6) amended, p. 11, § 3, effective March 13.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 675, § 4, effective August 6; (7) amended, p. 1232, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2004:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1204, § 75, effective August 4.

L. 2005:

(8) added, p. 26, § 1, effective March 11.

L. 2006:

(1)(a) amended, p. 188, § 12, effective March 31.

L. 2012:

(8)(a)(IV), (8)(a)(V), (8)(b), (8)(c), and (8)(d) amended, (HB 12-1077), ch. 26, p. 75, § 1, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-1012 (2) to (7) and (9).

31-31-303. Fire and police members' self-directed investment fund - management - investment.

The board shall be the trustee of the fire and police members' self-directed investment fund subject to the members' allocation of moneys in their accounts to the alternatives offered by the board. A member who exercises control over the plan assets in the members' account shall not be deemed to be a fiduciary by reason of such exercise of control, and the board shall not be liable for any loss that results from such exercise of control.

The board shall designate one or more financial institutions as custodians of the fire and police members' self-directed investment fund. All moneys paid or transmitted to the custodian shall be credited to appropriate accounts in the fund, and the custodian shall maintain a current inventory of all investments of the fund.

Disbursements from the fire and police members' self-directed investment fund shall be made, subject to the approval of the board, only for payment of the expenses of the association in connection with the administration of the fund, refunds to the members, benefits, and investment purposes.

The board may allow a member to exercise control of the investment of part or all of the member's accrued benefit under the member's plan. In allowing a member to exercise such control, the board shall:

Select at least three investment alternatives, each of which is diversified in itself, that allow the member a broad range of investments and a meaningful choice between risk and return in the investment of the member's accrued benefit;

Allow the member to change investments at least once each calendar quarter; and

Provide the member with information describing the investment alternatives, the nature, investment performance, fees, and expenses of investment alternatives, and other information to enable a member to make informed investment decisions.

The board shall adopt rules governing the calculation and allocation of earnings and losses under the various investment alternatives that it may offer, the transfer of assets between funds under each alternative, the allocation of a member's account between investment alternatives, and such other matters as may be necessary to its administration and management of the fire and police members' self-directed investment fund created pursuant to this section.

Any provider of investment products that contracts with the board shall be held to the standard of conduct set forth in paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of this section with respect to those functions over which the provider has substantial discretion. The board is authorized to take such steps, including but not limited to making contract amendments, as are required to accomplish the provisions of this subsection (5).

The board shall submit an annual audit of the fire and police members' self-directed investment fund to the general assembly and the annual audit of the fund to each employer. Each employer shall make the audit available for review by its members.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 188, § 13, effective March 31.